Utah statutes.
17B-2a-514.   Assignment of the right to water.

With the consent of the irrigation district board of trustees, a landowner in the district may assign the right to some or all of the water apportioned to the landowner's land for any one year to another bona fide landowner in the district for use in the district, if all charges for the water have been paid.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

